New Jersey, session 222, S2371.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established in the Department of Law and Public Safety a three-year Responsible School Violence Prevention, Preparation, and Protection Pilot Program, which would train law enforcement officers, mental health professionals, teachers and other school staff, and students to identify and report behaviors that signal potential threats to school safety with the intention of preventing school violence.  The pilot program shall be established in the counties of Bergen, Essex, Hudson, Middlesex, Morris, Passaic, and Union and in cities of the first class. b.   The Attorney General shall work in collaboration with the Commissioners of Health and Education to accomplish the goals of the pilot program which shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1)   the creation of a threat assessment measurement tool for use by law enforcement officers, mental health professionals, teachers and other school employees, and students to evaluate a potential threat of school violence; (2)   the development of a scientifically based school violence threat assessment and management training curriculum concerning the identification of behaviors that indicate a potential risk of school violence and the need to report these behaviors; (3)   the delivery of the school violence threat assessment and management training curriculum to law enforcement officers, mental health professionals, teachers and other school employees, and students; (4)   the development of an effective mechanism to immediately report an identified threat of school violence; and (5)   the establishment of procedures for addressing and eliminating an identified threat of school violence. c.    The Attorney General shall submit to the Governor and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), a report containing an evaluation of the pilot program not more than one year after the implementation of the pilot program, and annually thereafter for a total of three years. The report shall recommend whether the pilot program should be continued as a Statewide program. 2.    There shall be appropriated from the general fund such funds as are necessary to implement the provisions and to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.